Massachusetts, session 194th, H339.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 83 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new paragraph:-  
“All establishments and branches thereof for the preparation, disposition and care of dead 
human bodies shall participate in the program described in section 9 of chapter 117A as a 
condition for continued licensure.”    
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on December 31, 2027.